Utah statutes.
7-1-208.1.   Supervisor of trusts -- Qualifications -- Responsibilities.
The commissioner may designate an examiner as supervisor of trusts who shall
be a citizen of the United States and shall have sufficient training and
experience with regard to trusts to demonstrate his qualifications and fitness
to perform the duties of his office.  The supervisor of trusts is responsible,
subject to the direction and control of the commissioner, for the general
supervision and examination of all trusts subject to the jurisdiction of the
department under this title.  He shall assist and advise the commissioner in
the execution of the laws of this state relating to trusts and shall perform
other duties prescribed in this title or assigned to him by the commissioner.
